Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.080

Computation of interest.

(1) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall compute interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid tax or penalty in accordance with RCW 82.32.050.

(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall compute interest paid on refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed a taxpayer in accordance with RCW 82.32.060.

[ 2003 c 79 s 8.]